Illinois, session 104th, SB3496.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 50-28 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-28 new)7    Sec. 50-28. Qualifications for licensure; temporary 8suspension.9    (a) In order to protect the public and ensure safe and 10adequate health care services, if the Department finds that 11any person licensed or authorized to practice under this Act 12was not properly credentialed pursuant to the standards 13required at the time of application, the Department may 14temporarily suspend the person's license or authorization to 15practice without prior hearing until the Department receives 16satisfactory evidence of the licensee's overall 17qualifications.18    (b) The Department shall notify the licensee of the 19temporary suspension at the licensee's address of record or 20email address of record. The licensee may request that the 21Board review the validity of the license within 30 days after 22the service of the notice and shall submit written evidence in 23support of the licensee's qualifications with the request for   SB3496 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18326 AAS 31766 b1review. The licensee may seek an extension of time to provide 2such evidence, during which the suspension shall remain in 3effect. The Board, at its next regularly scheduled meeting, 4shall review the request and any written evidence provided by 5the licensee and make a final recommendation regarding the 6licensee's qualifications to the Director of the Division of 7Professional Regulation of the Department.8    (c) Based upon the Board's final recommendation, the 9Director of the Division of Professional Regulation may issue 10an order withdrawing the license due to the licensee's lack of 11qualifications or lift the suspension of the license by 12stipulating terms and conditions of practice. Withdrawal of 13the license alone shall not constitute discipline or be a bar 14to licensure if the licensee makes a subsequent reapplication 15that meets the qualifications under this Act.16    (d) Disciplinary proceedings may also be initiated 17pursuant to the Board's recommendation or Department findings 18and shall be conducted in the same manner as other 19disciplinary proceedings under this Act.20    (e) The Department may adopt rules to implement, 21administer, and enforce this Section.  22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.